Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1041
County treasurer; distribute school funds; when.

Each county treasurer of a county with territory in a learning community shall distribute any funds collected by such county treasurer from the common general fund levy of such learning community to each member school district pursuant to section 79-1073 at least once each month.

Each county treasurer shall, upon request of a majority of the members of the school board or board of education in any school district, at least once each month distribute to the district any funds collected by such county treasurer for school purposes.

Laws 1976, LB 803, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1307.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 687;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 47.